src-fst-affixes-pronouns.lexc.md
# Skolt Saami Pronoun Morphology 

The lexicon *PRON_*, which is actually not needed, as pronouns get +Pron tag earlier.

* +Nom:ij		K ;  mij, tij, sij
* +Gen:ij	      K ;  mij, tij, sij
* +Gen+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Use/SpellNoSugg:iʹjji    K ;  miʹjji, tiʹjji, siʹjji
* +Acc:iʹjjid	      K ;  miʹjjid, tiʹjjid, siʹjjid
* +Ill:iʹjjid	      K ;  miʹjjid, tiʹjjid, siʹjjid
* +Loc:eeʹst	      K ;  meeʹst, teeʹst, seeʹst
* +Com:ijvuiʹm     K ;  mijvuiʹm, tijvuiʹm, sijvuiʹm
* +Abe:ijtää	      K ;  mijtää, tijtää, sijtää

# Pronouns

Pointing to all the pronominal subgroups

* LEXICON Pronoun 
*  Demonstrative ; 
* jiõčč+Pron+Refl:   Reflexive ;     
*  Interrogative ; 
*  Relative ;	 kååʹtt, mii

## Personal pronouns

Splitting according to person

## Demonstrative pronouns

* LEXICON Demonstrative 
* tõt+Pron+Dem:t  	TOTDEM ;  The Epsilon has been removed 2015-05-13

* LEXICON SHORTDEM 

* LEXICON LONGDEM 

* LEXICON TOTDEM  

* LEXICON TIET-AA 

* LEXICON -AA 

## INDEFINITE PRONOUNS

## REFLEXIVE PRONOUNS

jiõčč: 

* LEXICON Reflexive 

Completion needed 2015-09-19

* LEXICON GA-I 

* LEXICON GA-II 

* LEXICON ILEPX 

* LEXICON LOCPX 

* LEXICON COMPX 

* LEXICON ROBLSGPX 

* LEXICON ROBLPLPX 

* LEXICON RCOMPLPX 

## Interrogative pronouns
**LEXICON PRON-INTERR_** is referred to from the xml file, hence does not assign **+Pron** tag.
* +Interr: # ;

* LEXICON Interrogative  is referred to from `pronouns.lexc`, hence assigns **+Pron** tag.
* mii+Pron+Interr:m	MK ;  The Epsilon  inserted 2015-02-11
* ǩii+Pron+Interr:ǩ	MK ;  The Epsilon  inserted 2015-02-11

* LEXICON MK 

* LEXICON MK-long 

* LEXICON MK-short 

* LEXICON MK-PL-short 

* LEXICON MK-low 

* LEXICON INDEF-MK 

* LEXICON INDEF-MK-long 

* LEXICON INDEF-MK-low-short 

* LEXICON INDEF-MK-low 

* LEXICON DISTR-MK 

* LEXICON DISTR-MK-long 

* LEXICON DISTR-MK-low-short 

* LEXICON DISTR-MK-low 

* LEXICON Relative 

* LEXICON Indefinite 

* LEXICON Distributive 

### SPATIAL PRONOUNS

### MISC

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/affixes/pronouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-sms/blob/main/src/fst/affixes/pronouns.lexc)</small>

---
